New Jersey, session 221, A2418.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  It shall be an unlawful practice for a person to advertise an offer for merchandise at reduced or no cost to the consumer and contingent upon the purchase of other merchandise, commonly referred to as a Buy One, Get One Free or Two-For-One offer, unless the advertisement discloses the usual and customary, single item price of the advertised merchandise. b.    A violation of any provision of subsection a. of this section shall be an unlawful practice pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.